Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 4. Tuberculosis.

§ 32.1-49.
Tuberculosis required to be reported.

The Board shall include tuberculosis in the list of diseases provided for in §

32.1-35

which are required to be reported.

History.

1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-49.1.
Definitions.

“Active tuberculosis disease”
means a communicable disease caused by an airborne microorganism and characterized by the presence of either (i) a specimen of sputum or other bodily fluid or tissue that has been found to contain tubercle bacilli as evidenced by culture or other definitive diagnostic test as established by the Commissioner, (ii) a specimen of sputum or other bodily fluid or tissue that is suspected to contain tubercle bacilli as evidenced by smear and sufficient clinical and radiographic evidence of active tuberculosis disease is present as determined by a physician licensed to practice medicine in the Commonwealth, or (iii) sufficient clinical and radiographic evidence of active tuberculosis disease as determined by the Commissioner is present, but a specimen of sputum or other bodily fluid or tissue containing or suspected to contain tubercle bacilli is unobtainable.

“Tubercle bacilli”
means disease-causing organisms belonging to the Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex and includes Mycobacterium tuberculosis, Mycobacterium bovis, Mycobacterium africanum or other members as established by the Commissioner.

“Tuberculosis”
means a disease caused by tubercle bacilli.

History.

2001, c. 459.

§ 32.1-50.
Examination of persons suspected of having active tuberculosis disease; reporting; report forms; report schedule; laboratory reports and required samples.

Any local health director may request any person having or reasonably suspected of having active tuberculosis disease to be examined immediately for the purpose of ascertaining the presence or absence of the disease. Such examination may be made by any licensed physician or licensed nurse practitioner selected by such person at his own expense and approved by the local health director or by the local health director at no cost to such person.

Each physician or nurse practitioner practicing in the Commonwealth who diagnoses or treats a person for active tuberculosis disease, or a physician assistant who treats a person for active tuberculosis disease, as defined in §

32.1-49.1

and each person in charge of a medical care facility providing inpatient or outpatient diagnosis or treatment for active tuberculosis disease shall report to the local health director within such time period and in such manner as may be prescribed by regulations of the Board. Such report, at a minimum, shall include an initial report when there are reasonable grounds to believe that a person has active tuberculosis disease, and a subsequent report when a person ceases treatment for tuberculosis disease. Cessation of treatment may be inferred when the person (i) fails to keep a scheduled appointment, (ii) relocates without transferring care, or (iii) discontinues care either upon or against the advice of the treating physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner.

The initial disease report shall include the following: the affected person’s name; date of birth; gender; address; pertinent clinical, radiographic, microbiologic, and pathologic reports, whether final or pending; such other information as is needed to locate the patient for follow-up; and any other information as prescribed by regulations of the Board.

Subsequent reports shall be submitted within such time, at such frequency, and in such manner as may be prescribed by regulations of the Board and shall provide updated clinical status, bacteriologic and radiographic results, assessment of treatment adherence, name of current care provider, and any other information as prescribed by the Board.

Every director of any laboratory doing business in the Commonwealth shall, according to the manner and schedule as determined by the Board, report any result diagnostic of or highly correlated with active tuberculosis disease, whether testing is done in-house or referred to an out-of-state laboratory, including cultures positive for tubercle bacilli and smears suggestive of tubercle bacilli, and shall report the results of tests for antimicrobial susceptibility performed on cultures positive for tubercle bacilli. Each director of any laboratory shall also submit a representative and viable sample of the initial culture to the Virginia Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services or other laboratory designated by the Board to receive such specimen in order to (i) ensure testing for antimicrobial susceptibility on each initial isolate from a person with active tuberculosis disease, and (ii) establish a library of such isolates for the purpose of disease strain analysis as indicated by epidemiological investigations.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-85.1; 1956, c. 482; 1979, c. 711; 2001, c. 459; 2004, c. 855; 2006, cc. 46, 396, 822.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall take effect 60 days following the effective date of the regulations promulgated by the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing required by the third enactment clause of this act.” Emergency regulations took effect July 15, 2004.

Acts 2004, c. 855, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing shall amend regulations governing the licensure of nurse practitioners to be effective within 280 days of enactment of this act. Such amendments shall require inclusion of the nurse practitioner’s authority for signatures, certifications, stamps, verifications, affidavits and endorsements in the written protocol between the supervising physician and the nurse practitioner.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 299 C, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The requirement for testing of tuberculosis isolates set out in §

32.1-50

E, Code of Virginia, shall be satisfied by the submission of samples to the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services, or such other laboratory as may be designated by the Board of Health.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 855 inserted “or licensed nurse practitioner” following “licensed physician” in subsection A; and inserted “or nurse practitioner” following “physician” twice in subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 46 and 822 are identical, and in subsection E, in the second sentence, inserted the clause (i) designation, clause (ii) and made a related change and deleted
“however, this requirement may be fulfilled by submission to the local health director of a report of antimicrobial drug susceptibility performed by a laboratory certified by existing state or national agencies to perform such testing”; and “The intention to file a written report shall be communicated to the local health director at the time the finding of a culture positive for tubercle bacilli is initially reported” at the end.

The 2006 amendment by c. 396, in subsection B, inserted “or a physician assistant who treats a person for active tuberculosis disease” in the first sentence and “physician assistant” in clause (iii).

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2006).

§ 32.1-50.1.
Treatment plan; submission of plan and mediation of disagreements; determination of cure.

Each physician practicing in the Commonwealth who assumes responsibility for the treatment of a person for active tuberculosis as defined in this article and each person in charge of a medical care facility providing inpatient or outpatient treatment to a person with active tuberculosis shall, with the assistance and acknowledgement of that person, develop, maintain, and update as indicated, an individualized written plan of treatment tailored to the person’s medical and personal needs and identifying the method for effective treatment and prevention of transmission. At a minimum, the plan shall specifically include verified patient address, name of the medical provider who has assumed responsibility for treatment, planned course of anti-tuberculosis drug therapy, estimated date of treatment completion, and means of ensuring successful completion of that treatment.

The written treatment plan shall upon request be submitted by the medical provider to the local health director in a manner determined by the Board and shall be subject to approval of the local health director. The Commissioner shall have the authority to settle, based on statewide standards, disagreements between the written plan so submitted and standards of care established by the local health director.

Each treating physician of or person in charge of a medical facility providing outpatient or inpatient care to a person with active tuberculosis disease shall maintain and submit to the local health director, upon his request, written documentation of that person’s adherence to the treatment plan.

Each person in charge of a medical care facility providing inpatient treatment to a person with active tuberculosis disease and each person in charge of a state correctional or local correctional or detention facility that has in its custody a person with active tuberculosis shall submit to the local health director, in the manner determined by the Board, the plan of treatment for such person as required in this article. The person in charge shall encourage the person to comply with such treatment plan; however, if such person with active tuberculosis indicates an unwillingness to comply with the treatment plan upon release, or exhibits behavior that indicates noncompliance, the person in charge, in conjunction with the local health director, may request the Commissioner to issue an emergency order requiring such person to be taken into custody pursuant to §

32.1-48.02

or other detention or custody options available pursuant to §

32.1-48.03

or §

32.1-48.04

.

Once established in a person, active tuberculosis disease shall be considered present until (i) the person has received a complete and adequate course of antituberculosis drug therapy as established by the Commissioner in accordance with guidelines developed by the American Thoracic Society and Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and (ii) three successive cultures of specimens of sputum or other bodily fluid or tissue collected at intervals of no less than one week, or other definitive diagnostic test as established by the Commissioner demonstrate no viable tubercle bacilli, or the Commissioner or his designee determines that the clinical, laboratory, or radiographic evidence leads to a diagnosis other than active tuberculosis disease.

History.

2001, c. 459.

§ 32.1-50.2.
Administration of tuberculin purified protein derivative by nurses; policies and guidelines.

The Department shall issue policies and guidelines governing the possession and administration of tuberculin purified protein derivative (PPD) by registered nurses and licensed practical nurses pursuant to § 54.1-3408.

History.

2003, c. 515.

§§ 32.1-51,
32.1-52.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 958.

Cross references.

As to isolation of certain persons with communicable diseases, see §

32.1-48.01

et seq.

§ 32.1-53.
Facilities and contracts for treatment of tuberculosis patients.

The Board may construct and operate hospitals and other facilities for the diagnosis and treatment of tuberculosis or enter into contractual arrangements with medical schools and hospitals in the Commonwealth for the care and treatment of tuberculosis patients.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-312; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-54.
Commissioner authorized to charge patients for care.

When a tuberculosis patient is admitted to a facility operated by the Board or under contract with the Board, the Commissioner shall determine whether such patient or any person legally liable for such patient’s support is able to pay in whole or in part for such patient’s care. In making such determination, the Commissioner shall consider whether such patient or other person can make such payment and meet his other financial responsibilities for the support of himself and his family. Such determination may be made from time to time according to the circumstances of each case. If the Commissioner determines that a patient or person legally liable for his support can pay for the cost of his care or a portion thereof, the Commissioner shall collect for the cost of such care the actual average per diem cost or such portion thereof as the Commissioner may determine the patient should pay. The Commissioner shall also collect any third-party payments as may be available for the care and treatment of such patient unless other contractual arrangements are made.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-312.1; 1954, c. 698; 1956, c. 499; 1979, c. 711.